Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-260
Notice; when given.

Any statement, notice, recommendation, determination, or similar action specified in the Student Discipline Act shall be effectively given at the time written evidence thereof is delivered personally to or upon receipt of certified or registered mail or upon actual knowledge by a student or his or her parent or guardian.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,174;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 64.